Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.640

Vulnerable individuals, in-home caregivers for vulnerable populations.

(1) Sensitive personal information of vulnerable individuals and sensitive personal information of in-home caregivers for vulnerable populations is exempt from inspection and copying under this chapter.

(2) The following definitions apply to this section:

(a) "In-home caregivers for vulnerable populations" means: (i) Individual providers as defined in RCW 74.39A.240, (ii) home care aides as defined in RCW 18.88B.010, and (iii) family child care providers as defined in RCW 41.56.030.

(b) "Sensitive personal information" means names, addresses, GPS [global positioning system] coordinates, telephone numbers, email addresses, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, or other personally identifying information.

(c) "Vulnerable individual" has the meaning set forth in RCW 9.35.005.

[ 2017 c 4 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 1501, approved November 8, 2016).]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 c 4 ss 8, 10, and 11 (Initiative Measure No. 1501): "It is the intent of part three of this act to protect seniors and vulnerable individuals from identity theft and other financial crimes by preventing the release of public records that could be used to victimize them. Sensitive personal information about in-home caregivers for vulnerable populations is protected because its release could facilitate identity crimes against seniors, vulnerable individuals, and other vulnerable populations that these caregivers serve." [ 2017 c 4 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 1501, approved November 8, 2016).]

Short title—Intent—Construction—2017 c 4 (Initiative Measure No. 1501): See notes following RCW 9.35.005.